Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.100

Illegal votes—List required for testimony.

No testimony may be received as to any illegal votes unless the party contesting the election delivers to the opposite party, at least three days before trial, a written list of the number of illegal votes and by whom given, that the contesting party intends to prove at the trial. No testimony may be received as to any illegal votes, except as to such as are specified in the list.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1710; 1965 c 9 s 29.65.090. Prior: Code 1881 s 3111, part; 1865 p 44 s 7, part; RRS s 5372, part. Formerly RCW 29.65.090.]